District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
18 act may be cited as the "St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025".
19 Sec. 2. The St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval
20 Act of 2022, effective March 10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-297; 70 DCR 835) is amended as follows:
21 (a) Section 2(6) is amended to read as follows:
22 "(6) "Project" means a mixed-use project that will include approximately 241 senior
23 living and multifamily units, 5,000 square feet of gallery/retail space, and any ancillary uses
24 allowed by law, as further described in the amended term sheet transmitted by the Mayor to the
25 Council with the St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025."
26 (b) Section 3 is amended as follows:
27 (1) Subsection (i) is amended by striking the phrase "executed term sheet" and
28 inserting the phrase "amended term sheet transmitted by the Mayor to the Council with the St.
29 Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025" in its place.
30 (2) A new subsection (j) is added to read as follows:
1

31 “(j) Future substantive changes to the business terms of the transaction described
32 in the term sheet may be made in accordance with Section 1(b-4)(1) of An Act Authorizing the
33 sale of certain real estate in the District of Columbia no longer required for public purposes,
34 approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211; D.C. Official Code § 10-801(b-4)(1)).”
35 Sec. 3. Applicability.
36 This act shall apply as of March 9, 2025.
37 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
38 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
39 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
40 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
41 Sec. 5. Effective date.
42 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
43 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
44 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
45 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
46 Columbia Register.
2

AMENDED COUNCIL TERM SHEET
Disposition of St Elizabeths East Parcel 13
Date ________, 2021 2025
Lessor Government of the District of Columbia (the “District”), acting by and
through the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
(“DMPED”).
Lessee The Neighborhood Development Company, L.L.C., Dantes Partners
Acquisitions LLC, or its successors and assigns as may be permitted
under the terms of the LDA (defined below) and approved by DMPED
(the “Developer”).
Real Property Real property, located at 1100 Alabama Ave., SE in Washington, D.C.,
comprised of approximately 3.17 acres of real property (approximately
138,162 square feet) which are part of the St. Elizabeths East Campus
designated under the District Zoning Code as Parcel StE-13, more
specifically known for tax and assessment purposes as Lot No. 850 in
Square S-5868 (the “Property”).
Land Disposition The Property will be conveyed by ground lease (“Ground Lease”) with
Agreement and a term of 99 years in accordance with the terms of a Land Disposition
Disposition and Development Agreement to be entered into between the District and
Structure the Developer (the “LDA”).
Consideration Base rent under the Ground Lease (“Basic Rent”) shall be One Dollar
($1.00) per year, payable in advance.
The Project The Developer intends to redevelop the Property as follows: (i)
approximately 21,000 gross square feet devoted to retail uses, 241
senior/multifamily units and (ii) 5,000 square feet of gallery/retail space
a residential building containing approximately 421 units (collectively,
the “Project”).
Affordable The Developer will comply with the Section 10-801 of the D.C. Official
Housing Code with regards to the provision of affordable housing units.
Closing The District’s obligation to ground lease the Property to the Developer
Conditions shall be conditioned on the conditions to closing as set forth in the LDA.
1

Development The Developer at the closing on the Project shall provide a development
and Completion and completion guaranty for the Project from a guarantor acceptable to
Guaranty DMPED in the exercise of its sole and absolute discretion that
guarantees: (i) the timely, lien free, final completion of the development
of the Project pursuant to the St Elizabeths East Master Plan and final
construction plans and specifications approved by DMPED for the
Project; (ii) the full and timely performance of all obligations arising
under the LDA relating to the Project; and (iii) the full and timely
performance arising under all other agreements with the District related
to the development and construction of the Project.
Green Building The Developer shall construct the Project in accordance with the Green
Requirements Building Act of 2006, D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.01, et seq. (2012
Supp.), as amended, and the regulations promulgated therewith.
Schedule of The following contains terms of the Schedule of Performance with
Performance estimated dates, which may be amended and extended with the approval
of DMPED in accordance with the terms of the LDA:
• Execution of the LDA – no later than sixty (60) days after
Council approval of the disposition resolution
• Closing – no later than two (2) six (6) years after Council’s initial
approval of the disposition
• Commencement of Construction – no later than ninety (90) days
after Closing
• Substantial Completion – no later than thirty-six (36) forty-two
(42) months after Commencement of Construction
• Final Completion – no later than twelve (12) months after
Substantial Completion.
Post-Closing The Developer shall be bound by the requirements of the Ground Lease,
Requirements Affordable Housing Covenant and the Construction and Use Covenant
to be attached to the LDA, which may be amended with the approval of
DMPED.
Certified The Developer has entered into a Certified Business Enterprise
Business Utilization and Participation Agreement in which the Developer
Enterprise acknowledges and agrees to be bound to the Certified Business
Enterprise contracting, equity and development requirements applicable
to the Project.
First Source The Developer has entered into a First Source Agreement with the
Department of Employment Services that shall govern certain
obligations of the Developer pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 2-219.03,
as amended, and Mayor's Order 83-265 (November 9, 1983) regarding
job creation and employment generated as a result of the construction of
the Project.
2

INTENTION AND LIMITATIONS OF THIS AMENDED TERM SHEET
1. Developer and DMPED acknowledge that they have prepared and signed this Amended
Term Sheet for the sole purpose of obtaining the approval of the Council of the District of
Columbia (the “Council”) to the proposed transaction. Developer acknowledges that
DMPED's negotiation of the LDA and this Amended Term Sheet, DMPED’s signature on
this Amended Term Sheet, and submission of this Amended Term Sheet and supporting
documents to the Council shall not bind the District to execute the LDA or to convey the
Property to the Developer. Developer further acknowledges that, notwithstanding Council
authorizing the conveyance of the Property, District has no obligation to do so absent
District and Developer duly executing the LDA and satisfaction of the conditions contained
therein. In the event DMPED or the Mayor determine, in their sole and absolute discretion,
to withhold submission of this Amended Term Sheet and supporting documents to the
Council or to otherwise decline to secure Council authorization for the conveyance,
DMPED may terminate negotiations with Developer and District shall not be responsible
for Developer's costs and expenses incurred in relation to the Property or the Project.
2. Developer acknowledges that all approvals required of the Council will be granted or
withheld in the sole and absolute discretion of the Council and that, absent Council
approval of the proposed transaction, DMPED has no authority to convey the Property to
Developer. Developer acknowledges that it is entering into this Amended Term Sheet prior
to obtaining all necessary Council approvals. In the absence of such approvals and
execution of the LDA, Developer proceeds at its sole risk and expense with no recourse
whatsoever against District.
3. Developer and DMPED agree that upon receipt of all necessary Council approvals,
Developer and DMPED intend to finalize and execute the LDA governing all of the terms
and conditions of the purchase and sale of the Property.
4. Until Developer and District enter into the binding LDA, both Developer and District
reserve the right to proceed with the proposed transaction in their sole and absolute
discretion. Upon the execution of the LDA, Developer and DMPED shall proceed in
accordance with the terms of the LDA; provided, however, that Developer and DMPED
acknowledge and agree that any substantive change in the terms set forth in this Term Sheet
shall be subject to further Council review and approval in accordance with D.C. Official
Code §10-801(b-4).
[Signatures on Following Page]
3

District and Developer have caused this Amended Term Sheet, dated ______ __, 2021
2025, to be signed and acknowledged by their respective duly authorized representatives.
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, by and through the
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and
Economic Development
By: ______________________________________
Nina Albert John Falcicchio
Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development
Dantes Partners Acquisition LLC, a District of
Columbia limited liability company
By: _
Buwa Binita
THE NEIGHBORHOOD DEVELOPMENT
COMPANY, L.L.C., a District of Columbia limited
liability company
By:
_________________________________________________
Adrian Washington
Chief Executive Officer
4

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
Commercial Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
THROUGH: David Fisher
Deputy Attorney General
FROM: Lawrence Wolk (for Lawrence Wolk)
Assistant Attorney General
DATE: September 12, 2025
SUBJECT: Undated Amended Term Sheet (Amended Term Sheet) Setting Forth New Terms for
the Disposition by Ground Lease of Property Located at 1100 Alabama Avenue, SE
in the St. Elizabeths East Campus (Lot 0850 in Square 5868S) (St Elizabeths East
Parcel 13) by the District of Columbia (District) to Dantes Partners Acquisitions,
LLC (Developer) by Ground Lease Pursuant to the St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13
Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of 2022, effective March 10, 2023
(D.C. Law 24-297) (the Act) (Amendment of Disposition)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Commercial Division of the Office of the
Attorney General has examined the captioned Amended Term Sheet marked against the prior term
sheet dated June 24, 2021, previously approved by the Council pursuant to the Act (Transaction
Document) by which the Land Disposition and Development Agreement and documents executed
thereunder are to be amended.
After a detailed examination of the Transaction Document, we conclude that it does not contravene
or violate any known legal requirements, obligations or commitments of the District government.
Accordingly, in its present form as provided to us, the Transaction Document is therefore approved
for legal sufficiency.
If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to call me at 202-724-5094.
400 Sixth Street, NW, Suite 9100, Washington, DC 20001 Tel. (202) 724-6658 Fax (202) 741-8930

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 15, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Term Sheet
Amendment Act of 2025
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 8,
2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2025 budget and proposed fiscal year 2026 through
fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
The St. Elizabeths campus is a National Historic Landmark located in Southeast Washington, D.C. and
comprised of a West and East campus. In 1987, the federal government transferred ownership of the
East campus to the District. The St. Elizabeths East redevelopment framework plan1 and the
subsequent St. Elizabeths East Master Plan and Design Guidelines established the vision, scope, and
details of how the District would revitalize the East campus.
In 2022, the Council declared as surplus property and approved the disposition of approximately
138,162 square feet of land on the East campus known as Parcel 13.2 The land, located at 1100
Alabama Avenue, S.E.,3 was designated to be redeveloped by the Neighborhood Development
Company, LLC into a mixed-use project, including over 400 residential units.
1 Saint Elizabeths East Redevelopment Framework Plan Approval Resolution of 2008, approved December 16,
2008 (Resolution 17-899; 56 DCR 516).
2 St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of 2022, effective March 10,
2022 (D.C. Law 24-297; 70 DCR 3528).
3 The land is known for assessment and tax purposes as Square S-5868, Lot 850.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “St. Elizabeths East Parcel 13 Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of
Revenue Analysis on September 8, 2025
The bill changes the project’s scope as described in the disposition legislation and updates the
reference to an amended term sheet for the redevelopment of Parcel 13. The amended term sheet
changes the development partner from Neighborhood Development Company, LLC to Dante Partners
Acquisitions, LLC. The new developer will build 241 senior or multifamily residential units and 5,000
square feet of gallery or retail space. The updated term sheet also extends the time to close on the
project after the initial disposition approval from two years to six years and provides the developer
an additional six months to reach substantial completion on the project following the commencement
of construction.4
The bill also establishes that any future substantive changes to the terms of the disposition should be
submitted to Council with a resolution for a 45-day review period.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2025 budget and proposed fiscal year 2026 through
fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. There are no costs associated with
changing the project’s scope or extending the potential closing date until March 2029, as indicated in
the amended Parcel 13 redevelopment term sheet.
4 The current term sheet requires the developer to be substantially complete within thirty-six months of
construction commencement. The amended sheet allows for a forty-two month timeline.
Page 2 of 2